Louisiana, session 2026, SB204.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. The heading of R.S. 56:305 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
7 follows:
8 §305. Commercial gear license; issuance to certain nonresidents prohibited;
9 moratorium on certain new gear licenses; renewals
10 * * *
11 Section 2. R.S. 56:305(C)(2) is hereby repealed.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.